src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! !!!Adjective inflection
!! The adjectives are inflected like regular nouns. The only morphological
!! difference in adjectives compared to other nouns is higher likelihood of
!! comparative derivations–they are fully productive. For adjectives that do
!! not compare, use qualifiers classification instead.
!! VISK § 300



!!  !!Adjective stem variation and allomorph selection
!!  Adjective stems are formed like noun stems, with similar patterns. Adjectives
!!  have additionally the productive comparative derivations, which may have
!!  their own stems, particularly an e-stem for a-stem words. The examples in
!!  this chapter are the same set of cases as with nouns:
!!  singular nominative, singular essive, singular inessive, plural essive,
!!  plural elative, singular partitives, singular illatives, plural partitives
!!  plural genitives, plural illatives and the compound forms. And also the
!!  comparative derivations: comparative singular nominative and superlative
!!  singular nominative. Majority of adjeciteves are equivalent to
!!  corresponding noun classes, so some examples have been omitted.

!!  !Bisyllabic / derivational adjective stems without stem variation
!!  The most basic adjective stems do not have any stem internal variation.
!!  They end in o, u, y or ö, and with some limited set of new words, e.
!!  This class has the fewest allomorphs. There are a number of productive
!!  adjective classes in this section, including all lexicalised nut 
!!  participle’s passives (-tu, -ty), moderative derivations (-hko, -hkö)
!!  and ...
!!  Examples follow in specific sub-classes.

LEXICON ADJ_TUMMAHKO
!!  The words in this class ending in o belong to {{@LEXNAME@}}, the old
!!  dictionaries use class ¹. The stems should be entered in dictionary like:
!!  {{{tummahko+A:tummahko A_TUMMAHKO  ;}}}
!!  This class includes back vowel moderative
!!  derivations. N.B. the comparative derivation of moderatives is semantically
!!  awkward, but morphologically plausible.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 o
!!€  tummahko: tummahko+A+Sg+Nom # darkish
!!€  tummahkona: tummahko+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  tummahkossa: tummahko+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  tummahkoina: tummahko+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  tummahkoissa: tummahko+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  tummahkoa: tummahko+A+Sg+Par
!!$  tummahkota: tummahko+A+Sg+Par
!!€  tummahkoon: tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!!$  tummahkohon: tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!!$  tummahkoseen: tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  tummahkoja: tummahko+A+Pl+Par
!!$  tummahkoita: tummahko+A+Pl+Par
!!€  tummahkojen: tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!!$  tummahkoiden: tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!!$  tummahkoitten: tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tummahkoihin: tummahko+A+Pl+Ill
!!$  tummahkoisiin: tummahko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  tummahkompi: tummahko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  tummahkoin: tummahko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VALKAISTU
!!  The stems ending in u are in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and in old dictionaries
!!  the class is ¹. These stems should be entered in dictionary like:
!!  {{{valkaistu+A:valkaistu A_VALKAISTU  ;}}}
!!  Common part of this class is formed by nut participle 
!!  passive’s _back_ vowel versions after s stem verbs:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 u
!!€  valkaistu: valkaistu+A+Sg+Nom # bleached
!!€  valkaistua: valkaistu+A+Sg+Par
!!€  valkaistuun: valkaistu+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  valkaistuna: valkaistu+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  valkaistussa: valkaistu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  valkaistuja: valkaistu+A+Pl+Par
!!€  valkaistujen: valkaistu+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  valkaistuihin: valkaistu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  valkaistuina: valkaistu+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  valkaistuissa: valkaistu+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  valkaistumpi: valkaistu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  valkaistuin: valkaistu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÄPÄISTY
!!  The stems ending in y are in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and in old dictionaries
!!  the class is ¹. Common part of this class is formed by nut participle 
!!  passive’s _front_ vowel versions after s stem verbs:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 y
!!€  häpäisty: häpäisty+A+Sg+Nom # defiled
!!€  häpäistyä: häpäisty+A+Sg+Par
!!€  häpäistyyn: häpäisty+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  häpäistynä: häpäisty+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  häpäistyssä: häpäisty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  häpäistyjä: häpäisty+A+Pl+Par
!!€  häpäistyjen: häpäisty+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  häpäistyihin: häpäisty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  häpäistyinä: häpäisty+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  häpäistyissä: häpäisty+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  häpäistympi: häpäisty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  häpäistyin: häpäisty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÖLÖ
!!  The words in this class ending in ö belong to {{@LEXNAME@}}, the old
!!  dictionaries use class ¹. This class includes front vowel moderative
!!  derivations.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 ö
!!€  hölö: hölö+A+Sg+Nom # blabbermouth
!!€  hölöä: hölö+A+Sg+Par
!!€  hölöön: hölö+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  hölönä: hölö+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  hölössä: hölö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hölöjä: hölö+A+Pl+Par
!!€  hölöjen: hölö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  hölöihin: hölö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hölöinä: hölö+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hölöissä: hölö+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hölömpi: hölö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  hölöin: hölö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TOOPE
!!  The new words with e stem have same allomorph selection as old short
!!  unchanging bisyllabic u, y, o and ö stems, and no stem-internal variation.
!!  The classification for the back vowel variant of this class is
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries used the class ⁸.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 8 back
!!€  toope: toope+A+Sg+Nom # doofus
!!€  toopea: toope+A+Sg+Par
!!€  toopeen: toope+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  toopeja: toope+A+Pl+Par
!!€  toopejen: toope+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  toopeihin: toope+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  toopempi: toope+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  toopein: toope+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
!!  They also have slightly greater probability for archaic form of plural
!!  genitive:
!!€  toopein: toope+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_BEIGE
!!  The front variation of unchanging e stems is class {{@LEXNAME}}, and in
!!  old dictionaries ⁸.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 8 front
!!€  beige: beige+A+Sg+Nom # beige
!!€  beigeä: beige+A+Sg+Par
!!€  beigeen: beige+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  beigejä: beige+A+Pl+Par
!!€  beigejen: beige+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  beigeihin: beige+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  beigempi: beige+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  beigein: beige+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  !Trisyllabic and longer non-derived adjectuve stems
!!  The trisyllabic and longer words with stem vowels o, u, y and ö also
!!  have no stem variation either, but selection of suffix allomorphs for 
!!  plural genitives and partitives is wider than for bisyllabic and derived
!!  ones.
