src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aivopesty+A:aivopesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
beige+A:beige  ADJ_BEIGE  ;
epähieno+A:epä#hieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
epäjalo+A:epäjalo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
fiksu+A:fiksu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
halju+A:halju  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
harsu+A:harsu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
helo+A:helo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
hipaistu+A:hipaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
hiuksenhieno+A:hiuksen#hieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
huippuhieno+A:huippuhieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
humu+A:humu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
häijy+A:häijy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
häilyvähkö+A:häilyvähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
häjy+A:häjy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
häpäisty+A:häpäisty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
häväisty+A:häväisty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
hölmö+A:hölmö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
hölö+A:hölö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
höpsö+A:höpsö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
ilmaistu+A:ilmaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
iso+A:iso  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
juhlavalaistu+A:juhlavalaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
julkaistu+A:julkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
jykevähkö+A:jykevähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
jymy+A:jymy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
jyrkähkö+A:jyrkähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
jäykähkö+A:jäykähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
jörö+A:jörö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kahjo+A:kahjo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kapeahko+A:kapeahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
karkaistu+A:karkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
katkaistu+A:katkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kattavahko+A:kattavahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
keltabeige+A:kelta#beige  ADJ_BEIGE  ;
keltabeige+A:keltabeige  ADJ_BEIGE  ;
kepeähkö+A:kepeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kesy+A:kesy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
kevyehkö+A:kevyehkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kiero+A:kiero  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kiinteähkö+A:kiinteähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kimeähkö+A:kimeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kireähkö+A:kireähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kirkaistu+A:kirkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kirpeähkö+A:kirpeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
komeahko+A:komeahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kovahko+A:kovahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kuuhullu+A:kuuhullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kuuhullu+A:kuuhullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kuuro+A:kuuro  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kuuru+A:kuuru  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kylmähkö+A:kylmähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kyyry+A:kyyry  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
kyömy+A:kyömy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
kömpelöhkö+A:kömpelöhkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
köyhähkö+A:köyhähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
köyry+A:köyry  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
laveahko+A:laveahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
lesty+A:lesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
loppuunkäsitelty+A:loppuunkäsitelty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
luihu+A:luihu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
lyhyehkö+A:lyhyehkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
lälly+A:lälly  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
lässy+A:lässy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
löllö+A:löllö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
maalaistollo+A:maalais#tollo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
maankuulu+A:maankuulu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
maankuulu+A:maankuulu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
miedohko+A:miedohko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
niuho+A:niuho  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
notko+A:notko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
nukkavieru+A:nukkavieru  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
nulju+A:nulju  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
nössö+A:nössö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
oudohko+A:oudohko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
paksu+A:paksu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pervo+A:pervo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
pesty+A:pesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
pienehkö+A:pienehkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
piru+A:piru  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pitkähkö+A:pitkähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
puhkaistu+A:puhkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pullo+A:pullo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
puolihullu+A:puoli#hullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pysty+A:pysty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
pyöreähkö+A:pyöreähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
pähkähullu+A:pähkähullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pölhö+A:pölhö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
raju+A:raju  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
roisto+A:roisto  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
ruskeahko+A:ruskeahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
selkeähkö+A:selkeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
siivoushullu+A:siivoushullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
sopivahko+A:sopivahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
superhieno+A:super#hieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
suuruudenhullu+A:suuruudenhullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
syvähkö+A:syvähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
tekaistu+A:tekaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
toope+A:toope  ADJ_TOOPE  ;
tukevahko+A:tukevahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
turhankaino+A:turhankaino  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
tyhmähkö+A:tyhmähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
tyly+A:tyly  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
töpö+A:töpö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
ujohko+A:ujohko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
urpo+A:urpo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
uuno+A:uuno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
valaistu+A:valaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
vankahko+A:vankahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
vesipesty+A:vesipesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
vesipesty+A:vesi#pesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
viileähkö+A:viileähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
vilu+A:vilu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
väsy+A:väsy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
ylpeähkö+A:ylpeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
äksy+A:äksy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
ärjy+A:ärjy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
